fi: Tuetun sisäisen levyaseman muototekijä: 2,5-tuumainen; 3,5-tuumainen; 5,25-tuumainen; Muu
fr: Facteur de forme du disque interne pris en charge: 2,5 pouces; 3,5 pouces; 5,25 pouces; Autre
pt-BR: Fator de forma de unidade interna com suporte: 2,5 polegadas; 3,5 polegadas; 5,25 polegadas; Outro
pl: Obsługiwany współczynnik kształtu napędu wewnętrznego: 2,5 cala; 3,5 cala; 5,25 cala; Inne
vi: Dạng thức ổ đĩa trong được hỗ trợ: 2,5 inch; 3,5 inch; 5,25 inch; Khác
nl: Ondersteunde interne schijfvormfactor: 2,5-inch; 3,5-inch; 5,25-inch; Andere
ru: Поддерживаемые форм-факторы внутреннего диска: 2,5 дюйма; 3,5 дюйма; 5,25 дюйма; Другой
ja: サポートされる内蔵ドライブフォームファクター: 2.5インチ; 3.5インチ; 5.25インチ; その他
nb: Formfaktor for intern stasjon støttes: 2,5 tommer; 3,5 tommer; 5,25 tommer; Annet
zh-CN: 支持的内部驱动器形状因子: 2.5 英寸; 3.5 英寸; 5.25 英寸; 其他
th: รองรับฟอร์มแฟคเตอร์ไดรฟ์ภายใน: 2.5 นิ้ว; 3.5 นิ้ว; 5.25 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Palaikoma vidinio disko forma ir dydis: 2.5 colio; 3.5 colio; 5.25 colio; Kita
de: Unterstützter Formfaktor des internen Laufwerks: 2,5 Zoll; 3,5 Zoll; 5,25 Zoll; Sonstiges
tr: Desteklenen Dahili Sürücü Form Faktörü: 2,5 inç; 3,5 inç; 5,25 inç; Diğer
el: Υποστηρίζεται ο παράγοντας μορφής εσωτερικής μονάδας δίσκου: 2,5 ιντσών; 3,5 ιντσών; 5,25 ιντσών; Άλλο
ko: 지원되는 내장형 드라이브 폼 팩터: 2.5인치; 3.5인치; 5.25인치; 기타
zh-TW: 支援的內部驅動器外形規格: 2.5 英寸; 3.5 英寸; 5.25 英寸; 其他
cs: Podporovaný form factor interního disku: 2,5 palce; 3,5 palce; 5,25 palce; Jiné
ro-RO: Formă unitate internă acceptată: 2,5 inchi; 3,5 inchi; 5,25 inchi; Altele
hr-HR: Podržani format hardvera unutarnjeg pogona: 2,5-inčni; 3,5-inčni; 5,25-inčni; Ostalo
bg-BG: Поддържа се типоразмер на вътрешно устройство: 2,5-инчов; 3,5-инчов; 5,25-инчов; Други
sl-SI: Podprt faktor oblike notranjega pogona: 2.5-palčni; 3,5 palca; 5,25-palčni; Drugo
hu: Támogatott belső meghajtó formája: 2,5 hüvelyk; 3,5 hüvelyk; 5,25 hüvelyk; Egyéb
en: Internal drive form factor supported: 2.5-inch; 3.5-inch; 5.25-inch; Other
da: Intern drev-formfaktor understøttet: 2,5 tommer; 3,5 tommer; 5,25 tommer; Andet
sv: Kompatibel formfaktor för intern hårddisk: 2,5 tum; 3,5 tum; 5,25 tum; Övrigt
pt-PT: Fator de forma de disco interno suportado: 2,5 polegadas; 3,5 polegadas; 5,25 polegadas; Outro
es: Factor de forma de unidad interna compatible: 2,5 pulgadas; 3,5 pulgadas; 5,25 pulgadas; Otros
sk-SK: Podporovaný formát interného disku: 2,5-palcový; 3,5-palcový; 5,25-palcový; Iné
it: Fattore di forma dell'unità interna supportato: 2,5 pollici; 3,5 pollici; 5,25 pollici; Altro